New York, session 2025-2026, A3359.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 156.25 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 89 2 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 376 of the laws 3 of 1997, subdivision 4 as amended by chapter 784 of the laws of 2021, 4 and subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 24 of the laws of 2022, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 § 156.25 Computer tampering in the third degree. 7 A person is guilty of computer tampering in the third degree when [he 8 commits] they commit the crime of computer tampering in the fourth 9 degree and: 10 1. [he does] they do so with an intent to commit or attempt to commit 11 or further the commission of any felony; or 12 2. [he has] they have been previously convicted of any crime under 13 this article or subdivision eleven of section 165.15 of this chapter; or 14 3. [he] they intentionally [alters] alter in any manner or [destroys] 15 destroy computer material; or 16 4. [he] they intentionally [alters] alter in any manner or [destroys] 17 destroy computer data or a computer program so as to cause damages in an 18 aggregate amount exceeding one thousand dollars; or 19 5. [he] they intentionally [enters or alters] enter or alter in any 20 manner or [destroys] destroy computer material indicating that a person 21 did or did not receive a vaccination against COVID-19; or 22 6. they intentionally enter or alter in any manner or destroy computer 23 material indicating that a person did or did not receive a vaccination 24 that is reported to the New York state immunization information system 25 or the New York city immunization registry. 26 Computer tampering in the third degree is a class E felony. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07234-01-5